Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 5
COMMITTEE ON LEGAL SERVICES -
OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE LEGAL SERVICES

Editor's note:

This part 5 was numbered as article 1 of chapter 135, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this part 5 were repealed and reenacted in 1968, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 5 prior to 1968, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

2-3-501. Legal services in legislative department.

In order to better provide for the legal services for the general assembly, including the drafting of legislation and the revision and publication of the laws of this state, and to provide for the best technical advice and information to be available to the general assembly, agencies of state government, and the people of this state, and to provide for the professional preparation, drafting, revision, and publication of laws, there is hereby created in the legislative department a committee on legal services and an office of legislative legal services, referred to, respectively, in parts 5 and 7 of this article, as the "committee" and the "office".

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 140, § 178.

L. 69:

p. 464, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 307, § 7, effective May 23.

2-3-502. Committee on legal services - membership - duties.

Except as provided in part 3 of this article, the committee shall supervise and direct the operations of the office of legislative legal services.

The committee may designate one or more subcommittees from among its membership to perform any duties of the committee with respect to the supervision and direction of the office of legislative legal services.

The membership of the committee consists of ten members of the general assembly. The ten legislative members of the committee are as follows: The respective chairs of the house and senate committees on judiciary or their respective designees; four members from the house of representatives, two from each major political party, one of whom shall be an attorney-at-law, if there is an attorney-at-law in each party, appointed by the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives, respectively, with the approval of a majority of the members elected to the house of representatives; and four members from the senate, two from each major political party, one of whom shall be an attorney-at-law, if there is an attorney-at-law in each party, appointed by the president and the minority leader of the senate, respectively, with the approval of a majority of the members elected to the senate.

The eight appointive members of the committee shall be appointed no later than ten days after the convening of the first regular session of each general assembly. An appointing authority may make an appointment to temporarily replace a current member of the committee appointed by that appointing authority. In addition, the president of the senate may make an appointment to temporarily replace the chair of the senate committee on judiciary or the chair's respective designee currently serving on the committee and the speaker of the house of the representatives may make an appointment to temporarily replace the chair of the house committee on judiciary or the chair's designee currently serving on the committee; except that a temporary appointment made pursuant to this subsection (4) does not require approval of a majority of the members elected to the applicable body. Membership on the committee of each such appointive member terminates upon the appointment of his or her successor or upon termination of a member's term of office in the general assembly, whichever first occurs. The membership of a judiciary committee chair terminates upon the termination of his or her term of office in the designated position. Any member may be appointed to succeed himself or herself on the committee. Vacancies in the committee's membership shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments; except that the approval of the members elected to the general assembly is not necessary if any such appointment is made when the general assembly is not in session.

The committee shall select from among its members a comittee chair and vice-chair, and it shall prescribe its own rules of procedure. The committee may meet as often as necessary, but it shall meet at least twice in each calendar year.

Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and shall be paid the same per diem compensation as provided by law for members of interim legislative committees for each day of attendance.

If any law or other document of this state refers to the legislative drafting committee or to the committee on statute revision, said law or other document shall be deemed to refer to the committee on legal services.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 24-6-402 to the contrary, the committee may take action on the question of retaining legal counsel pursuant to section 2-3-1001 by a poll of the committee members without holding a meeting, unless a committee member objects to polling on the question. The director of the office of legislative legal services or the director's designees may conduct the poll by in-person, electronic, or digital communication with committee members. Approval of the question by a majority of the committee members in response to the poll has the same effect as if the question were approved by a majority vote of the committee members taken in a committee meeting. If the committee approves a question by poll, the committee shall post on the committee website a notice of vote to retain counsel that at a minimum specifies the name of the legal counsel to be retained, the legal matter for which the legal counsel will provide representation, and the committee, agency, or individual that the legal counsel will represent. The notice of vote to retain counsel shall be posted within three business days after the poll is completed.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 140, § 178.

L. 69:

p. 464, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-2.

L. 71:

p. 628, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 674, § 1.

L. 79:

(3) amended, p. 299, § 1, effective July 13.

L. 81:

(6) amended, p. 2022, § 2, effective July 14.

L. 85:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 276, § 1, effective June 13.

L. 88:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 307, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 2108, § 10, effective June 9.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1625, § 13, effective May 31.

L. 2016:

(3) and (4) amended, (SB 16-156), ch. 282, p. 1155, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 2022:

(5) amended and (8) added, (SB 22-062), ch. 17, p. 130, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For compensation for members of interim legislative committees, see § 2-2-307 (3).

2-3-503. Director - staff - revisor.

The committee shall interview persons applying for the position of staff director as to qualifications and ability and shall make recommendations thereon to the executive committee, which shall appoint the director as provided in section 2-3-303 (3). The director of the office of legislative legal services shall be an attorney-at-law. The director shall be responsible to the committee for the provision of staff assistance in the performance of the committee's duties and functions. The director, with the approval of the committee, may appoint such attorneys-at-law and technical and clerical personnel as may be necessary for the efficient operation of the office. The director and all employees of the office shall be appointed without regard to affiliation and solely on the basis of their ability to perform their duties. They shall be employees of the general assembly and shall not be subject to the state personnel system laws. The director shall be paid a salary determined by the executive committee in accordance with section 2-3-303 (3).

The director shall be, ex officio, the revisor of statutes; except that the director, in his discretion, may appoint an employee of the office to be the revisor of statutes and to exercise the powers and perform the duties and functions assigned to the revisor by part 7 of this article or by any other law.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 140, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-3.

L. 88:

Entire section R&RE, p. 307, § 9, effective May 23.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 2108, § 11, effective June 9.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1625, § 14, effective May 31.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 163, § 22, effective August 4.

2-3-504. Duties of office.

The office shall:

Upon the request of any member of the general assembly or the governor, draft or aid in drafting legislative bills, resolutions, memorials, amendments thereto, conference reports, and such other legislative documents and papers as may be required in the legislative process;

Prepare a digest of laws enacted by the general assembly, approved or vetoed by the governor, immediately upon the adjournment of any regular or special session;

In the interim between sessions of the general assembly, prepare drafts of proposed legislation for legislative interim committees appointed by the legislative council or otherwise;

Prepare, at the request of any legislative committee, summaries of existing laws affected by proposed legislation, compilations of laws in other states relating to the subject matter of such legislation, and statements on the operation and effect of such laws;

Keep on file records concerning legislative bills and the proceedings of the general assembly with respect to such bills; subject indexes of bills introduced at each session of the general assembly; files on each bill prepared for members of the general assembly and the governor; and such documents, pamphlets, or other literature relating to proposed or pending legislation, without undue duplication of material contained in the office of the legislative council or in the supreme court library. All such records and documents shall be made available in the office at reasonable times to the public for reference purposes, unless said records are classed as confidential under this part 5.

Cooperate with legislative drafting offices or corresponding services of other states, and with other legislative drafting service agencies, either public or private;

Aid and assist in the enrolling and engrossing of bills and such other services as the general assembly may require.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 141, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-4.

L. 88:

(1)(g) added, p. 308, § 10, effective May 23.

2-3-505. Requests for drafting bills and amendments - confidential nature thereof - lobbying for bills.

All requests made to the office for the drafting of bills or amendments thereto shall be submitted, either in writing or orally, by the legislator or by the governor or the governor's representative making the request, with a general statement respecting the policies and purposes which the person making the request desires the bill or amendment to accomplish. The office shall draft each bill or amendment to conform to the purposes so stated or to supplementary instructions of the person making the original request.

Prior to the introduction of a bill or amendment in the general assembly, no employee of the office shall reveal to any person outside the office the contents or nature of such bill or amendment, except with the consent of the person making the request. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the disclosure to the staff of any legislative service agency of such information concerning bills or amendments prior to introduction as is necessary to expedite the preparation of fiscal notes, as provided by the rules of the general assembly, but such staff shall not reveal the contents or nature of such bills or amendments to any other person without the consent of the person making the request.

All documents prepared or assembled in response to a request for a bill or amendment, other than the introduced version of a bill or amendment that was in fact introduced, shall be considered work product, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6.5), C.R.S.

The final version of all documents prepared or assembled by the office for a member of the general assembly but not in response to a request for a bill or amendment and not containing legal analysis or expressing a legal opinion or conclusion shall not be considered work product as defined in section 24-72-202 (6.5), C.R.S. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2), the final version of such documents shall be a public record. These documents include, but are not limited to:

Comparisons of existing law with the provisions of any bill or amendment, comparisons of any bills or amendments with other bills or amendments, comparisons of different versions of bills or amendments, and comparisons of the laws of this state with laws of other jurisdictions;

Compilations of existing public information, statistics, or data;

Compilations or explanations of general areas or bodies of law, legislative history, or legislative policy.

Prior to delivery of the final version of such a document to the member who requested it, no employee of the office shall reveal to any person outside the office the contents or nature of the document, except with the consent of the member making the request.

If a member of the general assembly requests a legal opinion or document from the office that is the same as or substantially similar to a legal opinion or document previously requested by another member, the office may produce an identical or substantially similar legal opinion or document for the second member. The office shall not disclose the identity of any member who made a previous request.

A member may request that the final version of a document that would otherwise become a public record in accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection (2) remain work product.

No employee of the office shall lobby, personally or in any other manner, directly or indirectly, for or against any pending legislation before the general assembly.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 141, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-5.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 11, effective May 23.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1479, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1103, § 1, effective August 6.

2-3-506. Use of supreme court library.

The librarian of the supreme court library shall facilitate the work of the office by permitting the liberal withdrawal of materials and data therefrom, subject to such reasonable rules as may be necessary for the proper operation of the library.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 141, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-6.

2-3-507. Office space in capitol - office hours - appropriations.

The office shall be provided with suitable office space in the state capitol, so situated as to be convenient for the members of the general assembly. Throughout the year, the office shall be kept open during the hours prevailing in other offices in the state capitol, and at such other times in order to efficiently serve the general assembly.

Adequate appropriations shall be made to carry out the purposes of this part 5, to be included in the appropriation to the legislative department. The controller is authorized and directed to draw warrants monthly in payment of the salaries of personnel, and in payment of expenditures of the office, on vouchers signed by the chair of the committee or, in the absence of the chair, by the vice-chair; except that any payroll voucher or any other voucher that does not exceed five thousand dollars may be signed by the staff director or, with prior written approval of the chair of the committee, by the staff director's authorized designee.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 141, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-7.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 348, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-031), ch. 23, p. 55, § 1, effective March 18.

2-3-508. Terminology - references.

The office of legislative legal services shall be the successor in every way of the legislative drafting office and the office of revisor of statutes, and every contract, agreement, or other document entered into by the legislative drafting office or the office of revisor of statutes prior to May 23, 1988, is deemed to have been entered into by the office of legislative legal services. The director and the employees of the legislative drafting office and the office of revisor of statutes shall become employees of the office of legislative legal services on May 23, 1988. The director and such employees shall retain all accrued rights to retirement and other benefits under the laws of the state, and their service shall be deemed to have been continuous. If any law of this state refers to the legislative drafting office or the office of revisor of statutes, said law shall be construed as referring to the office of legislative legal services.

Source:

L. 68:

R&RE, p. 142, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-8.

L. 88:

Entire section R&RE, p. 308, § 12, effective May 23.

2-3-509. Transfer of employees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 68:

p. 142, § 180.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-9.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 313, § 24, effective May 23.

2-3-510. Study regarding an organizational recodification of title 12 of the Colorado Revised Statutes - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-163), ch. 283, p. 1157, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) and (4) amended, (SB 18-031), ch. 285, p. 1772, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2019. (See L. 2018, p. 1772.)

2-3-511. Office of legislative workplace relations - creation - duties - records - definitions.

The office of legislative workplace relations is created in the office of legislative legal services. The head of the office is the director of the office of legislative workplace relations. The director of the office of legislative legal services shall appoint the director of the office of legislative workplace relations and may appoint such additional staff as may be necessary for the efficient operation of the office, in accordance with section 2-3-503 (1).

The office of legislative workplace relations shall provide services to the general assembly, its members and employees, and the legislative staff agencies related to employee relations; training; compliance; workplace culture, including the investigation of complaints under the workplace expectations policy; and workplace harassment, including the investigation of complaints under the workplace harassment policy.

Records created and maintained by the office of legislative workplace relations that are related to a workplace harassment complaint or investigation, a complaint under the workplace expectations policy, or an inquiry or request concerning workplace harassment or conduct, whether or not the inquiry or request leads to a formal or informal complaint or resolution process, are not public records as defined in section 24-72-202 (6) and shall not be made available for public inspection; except that, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-72-204 (3)(a)(X):

The director of the office of legislative workplace relations shall publish and make available to the public an annual statistical report showing the total number of complaints received under the workplace harassment policy and the workplace expectations policy and their resolution. The director shall ensure that the report does not contain information that would disclose the identity of a complainant, respondent, or witness.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section, if, after an investigation in accordance with the workplace harassment policy, a workplace harassment committee of the senate or house of representatives finds that the facts found more likely than not in the investigation establish a violation of the policy by a member of the general assembly, the director of the office of legislative workplace relations shall make available to the public the executive summary of the report of the investigation and the name of the member. The director shall ensure that the executive summary does not contain information that would disclose the identity of the complainant or any witness.

The committee may decide by a two-thirds vote to not release the executive summary as required by subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section. The committee shall meet in executive session to determine whether to release the executive summary or any portion thereof and shall take into consideration the severity of the conduct alleged, any patterns of harassing behavior by the member, and the public's interest in being informed of the conduct of elected officials.

Records of the expenditure of public money on complaints, investigations, or other functions of the office of legislative workplace relations are public records subject to inspection in accordance with part 2 of article 72 of title 24, except to the extent that they contain information that would disclose the details of, or the identity of an individual involved in, a complaint, investigation, or inquiry or request concerning workplace harassment or conduct.

The office of legislative workplace relations shall be provided with suitable office space in the state capitol or in a nearby building. The office space must be situated so as to provide confidentiality and convenient access for individuals covered by the workplace harassment policy and the workplace expectations policy.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Workplace expectations policy" means the workplace expectations policy adopted by the executive committee of the legislative council pursuant to the joint rules.

"Workplace harassment policy" means the workplace harassment policy adopted by the executive committee of the legislative council pursuant to the joint rules.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-244), ch. 243, p. 2375, § 1, effective May 20.